trunk/morphology/normalizer/spanish-relax.xfst
# set char-encoding utf-8
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-

# recognizes quechua words with spanish roots, with relaxation on orthography e/i, o/u, v/w, j/h, c/k etc.

       #derivation boundary
       define DB [[ "[" "^DB" "]"] :0];

      #Morpheme-Boundary
       define MB [[ "[""--""]"] :0];

       #-------------------------------#
       # Delete all flag on both sides #
       #-------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1 [["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@MPA"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@SIS"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@PLYUQ"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"|"@PORTMANTEAU"|"@PLspES"|"@PLspS"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@MPA"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@SIS"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"|"@PORTMANTEAU"|"@PLspES"|"@PLspS"] ];

############################################################################### 

          #########################
          #                       #
          # PHONETIC VARIATIONS   #
          #                       #
          #########################

      define Numbers [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%,|%.|%'];
      define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|Ü|"@TA"|{pa}"@PA"|"@PTI"|"@STI"];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|B|C|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|Ñ|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z|'|{m}"@MU"|{m}"@MI"|{s}"@SI"|{ch}"@CHA"|{ntin}"@NTIN"|{p}"@PA"|{q}"@PA"|"@PLspS"|"@PLspES"];
      
      define VowelRoot [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|Ü];
      define ConsRoot [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|B|C|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|Ñ|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z];

      
      #--------------------------#
      # allow uppercase letters  #
      #--------------------------#

      define LowerCase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ, Á (->) á, É (->) é, Í (->) í, Ó (->) ó , Ú (->) ú];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ, á (->) Á, é (->) É, í (->) Í, ó (->) Ó, ú (->) Ú ];
      
      define Allophone [ u (->) o||  _  (s|t|n|r|l|"@KU"|"@PU"|"@MU"|"@RQU") q, q (s|t|n|r|h|l|') _  , _ (s|t|n|r|l|"@KU"|"@PU"|"@MU"|"@RQU"){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|h|l|') _ ] .o. [i (->) e || _ (s|t|n|r|h|l|"@PTI"|"@CHI"|"@YSI") q, q (s|t|n|r|l|ll|h|') _ , _ (s|t|n|r|h|l|"@PTI"|"@CHI"|"@YSI"){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|l|ll|') _  ];

      #---------------------------#
       # alternative orthographies #
       #---------------------------#

       # dialecatal variations
       define Orthography1 [ {ch} (->) {ts}, {Ch} (->) {Ts} ];
       
       # spanish Orthographies
       define Orthography2 [ {q} (->) {cc}, q (->) {ck}];
       define Orthography3 [ {wi} (->) {hui}, {Wi} (->) {Hui}  ];
       define Orthography4 [ {wa} (->) {hua}, {Wa} (->) {Hua} ];
       define Orthography5 [ {wa} (->) {gua}, {Wa} (->) {Gua}];
       define Orthography6 [ {w} (->) {u} || Vowel _ ];
       define Orthography7 [ {k} (->) {qu} || _ [i|e] ];
       define Orthography8 [ {k} (->) {c} || _ ~$[i|e] ];
       define Orthography9 [ {ch'} (->) {chch}, {ch'} (->) {chh}, s (->) {ss}, {chh} (->) {ch} , {chh} (->) {chch}];
       define Orthography10 [ {q'} (->) {qq} , {q'} (->) {kc} , {qh} (->) {kc} , {q'i} (->) {qque}, {qi} (->) {qque} ];
       define Orthography11 [ {t'} (->) {tt} , {k'} (->) {kc} , {th} (->) {tj}];
       define Orthography12 [ {k'} (->) {kk} ,{kh} (->) {cj} ];
       define Orthography13 [ {p'} (->) {pp} , {ph} (->) {pj}];
       define Orthography14 [ {y} (->) {i} , {yku} (->) {yqu}, {yki} (->) {iqui}];
       define Orthography15 [ n (->) m || _ p];
       
       # fricatives in syllable coda
       define Orthography16 [ {h} (->) {j}, {H} (->) {J} ];
       define Orthography17 [ [{k}|{q}] (->) {j} || Vowel_ ];       
       define Orthography18 [ {ph} (->) {f}];     
       
       
       define Orthography [Orthography1 .o. Orthography2 .o. Orthography3 .o. Orthography4 .o. Orthography5 .o.  Orthography6 .o. Orthography7 .o. Orthography8 .o. Orthography9 .o. Orthography10 .o. Orthography11 .o. Orthography12 .o. Orthography13 .o. Orthography14 .o. Orthography15 .o. Orthography16 .o. Orthography17 .o. Orthography18 ];

       define QuechuaOrtho Allophone .o. Orthography;
       
       define SPOrthography1 [ {u} (->) {w} || _ Vowel ];
       define SPOrthography2 [ {j} (->) {h}, {J} (->) {H} ];
       define SPOrthography3 [ {f} (->) {ph}];
       define SPOrthography4 [ {j} (->) {q} || Vowel _ Vowel];
       define SPOrthography5 [ {o} (->) {u}];
       define SPOrthography6 [ {e} (->) {i}];
       define SPOrthography7 [ {z} (->) {s}];
       define SPOrthography8 [ {c} (->) {k} || _ [o|u|a] ];
       define SPOrthography9 [ {c} (->) {s} || _ [i|e] ];
       define SPOrthography10 [ {ia} (->) {iya}];
       define SPOrthography11 [ {io} (->) {iyu}];
       define SPOrthography12 [ [v|b] (->) {w}];
       define SPOrthography13 [ {ado} (->) {aw} || _ .#.];
       define SPOrthography14 [ {ado} (->) {aru} || _ .#.];
       
       define SPOrthography [SPOrthography1 .o. SPOrthography2 .o. SPOrthography3 .o. SPOrthography4 .o. SPOrthography5 .o.  SPOrthography6 .o. SPOrthography7 .o. SPOrthography8 .o. SPOrthography9 .o. SPOrthography10 .o. SPOrthography11 .o. SPOrthography12 .o. SPOrthography13  .o. SPOrthography14 ];

       # apply after Cleanup
       define Accent1 [ a (->) á, u (->) ú ||  _ [w|y] .#.];
       define Accent2 [ {qa} (->) {qá}, {taq} (->) {táq}, {ri} (->) {rí}|| _  .#.];
       define Accent Accent1 .o. Accent2;
       
        #-------------------------------------------------#
       # Orthography of Spanish loan words:              #
       #                                                 #
       #- may be written with or without their accents   #
       #- e may be written as i, o as u in Spanish words #
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       define AccentES [ á (->) a,é (->) e,í (->) i, ó (->) o,ú (->) u, ü (->) u];
       define spanLetras1 [ e (->) i, o (->) u || .#. ~$[e|o] _ ~$[e|o] .#. ];
       define spanLetras2 [  c (->) k , v (->) w , j (->) h];
       define SpanOrtho AccentES .o. spanLetras1 .o. spanLetras2 .o. SPOrthography;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               MORPHOPHONOLOGICAL RULES                             ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################

      ###########
      # NOMINAL #
      ###########

      #-----------------------------------------------------#
      # Possessive -nkuna -> ambiguous: -n-kuna or nku-kuna #
      #-----------------------------------------------------#

      # define 3PossPl  [ {nku} %["NPers"%] %["+3.Pl.Poss"%] (<-) n %["NPers"%] %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];
       define 3PossPl  [  %["+3.Poss"%] <-  %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       #----------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive -ykuna -> ambiguous: y-kuna or yku-kuna #
       #----------------------------------------------------#

      # define 1PossPl [ {yku} %["NPers"%] %["+1.Pl.Excl.Poss"%] (<-) y %["NPers"%] %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];
       define 1PossPl [  %["+1.Poss"%] <-  %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       define PossessivPlural [3PossPl .o. 1PossPl];
       
       #---------------------------------------------------#
       # Spanish -es after onsonant, -s after vowel        #
       #---------------------------------------------------#
       define spanPL1 [  {s}"@PLspS"  => VowelRoot _  ];
       define spanPL2 [  {es}"@PLspES"  => ConsRoot _  ];
       define spanPL spanPL1 .o. spanPL2;

       #------------------------------------------------------------#
       # Genitive -pa after Konsonant, -q/-p after Vowel (optional) #
       #------------------------------------------------------------#
      # define GENITIV [ {pa}"@PA" (->) [{p}|{q}]"@PA"  ||Vowel  _ ];
	define PA1 [  {q}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define PA2 [  {p}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	#define PA3 [  {pa}"@PA" => Cons _  ];
      define GENITIV PA1 .o. PA2 ;

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive forms need euphon. -ni/-ñi after Consonants #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#

       # define POSSESSIV1 [ "@POSS" -> {ni}  || Cons _ ];
       # define POSSESSIV2 [ "@POSS" ->  "" || [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú] _ ];
       # define POSSESSIV POSSESSIV1 .o. POSSESSIV2;

	define POSS1 [ "@POSS"  => [Vowel & ~$[{ni}]] _  ];
	define POSS2 [ "@POSSni" => Cons _  ];
	
	# misspelled -yki after -i: wasiki -> recognized as wasiyki
	define POSS3 [ "@Misspelled" => [{i}|"@PTI"] _  ];
	
	define POSSESSIV POSS1 .o. POSS2 .o. POSS3;

       define NounRules GENITIV .o. spanPL .o. POSSESSIV;
       
       
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # with Spanish plural forms in -es: remove accent on last syllable, if present (afán -> afanes) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define accentSPpl1 [ a <- á  \\ _  ConsRoot %["NRootES"%] %["--"%]{es}%["Num"  ];
       define accentSPpl2 [ e <- é  \\ _  ConsRoot %["NRootES"%] %["--"%]{es}%["Num"  ];
       define accentSPpl3 [ i <- í  \\ _  ConsRoot %["NRootES"%] %["--"%]{es}%["Num"  ];
       define accentSPpl4 [ o <- ó  \\ _  ConsRoot %["NRootES"%] %["--"%]{es}%["Num"  ];
       define accentSPpl5 [ u <- ú  \\ _  ConsRoot %["NRootES"%] %["--"%]{es}%["Num"  ];
       define NounRulesUpper accentSPpl1 .o. accentSPpl2 .o. accentSPpl3 .o. accentSPpl4 .o. accentSPpl5;


       ##########
       # VERBAL #
       ##########

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # CONTEXT RESTRICTIONS:                                  #
       # na as +Rzpr has be followed by ku, chi or spa          #
       # mu shortened to 'n' is only allowed preceding pu       #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define naRzpr [  "+Rzpr"  => _ ?* ["+Rflx_Int"|"+Caus"|"+SS"] ];
       define shortYKU [  "+y+"  => _ %["VDeriv"%] %["+Aff"%] "@YKU" %["^DB"%] %["--"%]{wa}%["VPers"%] ];
       
       # transitive forms
       define watrans [  "@WA"  => "+1.Obj" ?* _  ];
       define sutrans [  "@SU"  => "+2.Obj" ?* _  ];
       
       # sometimes inverted sequence (with "@PORTMANTEAU" ): 
       # sqa-sunki, rqa-sunki instead of su-rqa-nki -> limit these forms to after +Prog, +NPst, +Ipst
       define portmanteau [  "@PORTMANTEAU"  => ["+IPst"|"+Prog"|"+NPst"] ?* _  ];
